Maine, session 132, LD1265.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §7061, sub-§4, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. UUU, §1,
is amended to read:
B. The procedure must provide for a market pay study every 4 years that compares the
salaries of state employees with employees performing comparable work for a
sampling of private and public employees in this State, other New England states and
other states as appropriate. The bureau shall issue a request for proposals and contract
with an experienced contractor to complete a market pay study conducted pursuant to
this paragraph. The bureau shall submit the market pay study and a report on the market
pay study to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
appropriations and financial affairs, the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over state and local government matters and the bargaining agents
that represent a bargaining unit of state employees no later than September 30, 2024
and every 4 years thereafter.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §7061, sub-§4, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. UUU, §1,
is amended to read:
C. Beginning in 2024, the procedure must provide for a comprehensive review of the
classification plan every 10 years to make modifications and improvements as
determined necessary. The bureau shall issue a request for proposals and contract with
an experienced contractor to complete these reviews.
Sec. 3. Funds transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
State Controller shall transfer $2,000,000 on or before June 30, 2027 from the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Salary Plan program, General Fund account to
the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to provide funding to contract with
contractors to complete market pay studies and reviews pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 5, section 7061, subsection 4, paragraphs B and C.
Page 1 - 132LR1702(10)

Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Human Resources 0038
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to contract with a consultant to complete market pay
studies and reviews prior to the report deadline of September 30, 2028.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
Page 2 - 132LR1702(10)